New Jersey, session 222, S2474.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2021, c.133, there is appropriated out of the General Fund the following sum for the purpose specified: 74 DEPARTMENT OF STATE 30 Educational, Cultural, and Intellectual Development 36 Higher Educational Services 2415 Agricultural Experiment Station GRANTS-IN-AID 82-2415  Institutional Support................................................ $300,000 Total Grants-in-Aid Appropriation, Agricultural Experiment Station ........................ $300,000 Grants-in-Aid: 82   New Jersey Agricultural Experiment Station  Rutgers University ............................................. ($300,000) Of the amount hereinabove appropriated for the New Jersey Agricultural Experiment Station  Rutgers University, $300,000 shall be allotted to continue and expand the Rutgers Veterans Environmental Technology and Solutions program. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.